Washington statutes.
RCW 18.340.010

Intent.

The lives of military families are dominated by frequent deployments, relocations, and extended periods of single parenthood. Military spouses are some of the most mobile populations in our country, making the maintenance of professional licenses a significant obstacle. According to the 2010 defense management data center, there are thirty-three thousand three hundred eighty active duty and ten thousand eight hundred thirty-seven reserve military spouses residing in Washington. Military families depend on two incomes and want to achieve their goals and aspirations. It is the intent of the legislature to recognize the sacrifices made by military families in service to our country and our state and to help alleviate the hardships military families face due to their highly transient life.

[ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1.]

NOTES:

Implementation—2011 2nd sp.s. c 5: "The regulating authorities for the department of licensing, the department of health, the department of labor and industries, and the superintendent of public instruction shall appear before the joint committee on veteran and military affairs in December 2012 to inform the committee as to their efforts to implement the requirements of this chapter." [ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 3.]